Utah statutes.
34-24-1.   Blacklisting employees prohibited.
No person shall blacklist or publish, or cause to be published or blacklisted,
any employee discharged or voluntarily leaving the service of any person,
company or corporation with intent and for the purpose of preventing such
employee from engaging in or securing similar or other employment from any
other person, company or corporation.
